California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(f) An article composed of platinum and any other material or metal not resembling, appearing or purporting to be platinum, may be marked with the word “platinum”; provided, all parts or portions of such article resembling or appearing or purporting to be platinum, or reasonably purporting to be described as platinum by said quality mark, shall be at least 985/1000ths parts pure platinum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22129.

Abbreviations. Whenever provided for in this article, and except as specifically excepted in paragraph (d) of Section 22128:

(a) The word “platinum” may be applied by spelling it out in full or by the abbreviation “plat.”

(b) The word “iridium” may be applied by spelling it out in full or by the abbreviation “irid.”

(c) The word “palladium” may be applied by spelling it out in full or by the abbreviation “pall.”

(d) The word “ruthenium” may be applied by spelling it out in full or by the abbreviation “ruth.”

(e) The word “rhodium” may be applied by spelling it out in full or by the abbreviation “rhod.” and

(f) The word “osmium” may be applied by spelling it out in full or by the abbreviation “osmi.”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22130.

In any action relating to the enforcement of any provision of this article, a certificate duly issued by an assay office of the Treasury Department of the United States, certifying the weight of any article, or any part thereof, or of the kind, weight, quality, fineness or quantity of any ingredient thereof, shall be receivable in evidence as constituting prima facie proof of the matter or matters so certified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22131.

In any action relating to the enforcement of any provision of this article, proof that an article has been marked in violation of the provisions of this article shall be deemed to be prima facie proof that such article was manufactured after this article became effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

22132.

Any person or any officer, director, employee or agent of any person who makes, sells, or offers to sell, or dispose of, or has in his possession, with intent to sell or dispose of any article to which is applied any quality mark which does not conform to all of the provisions of this article, or from which is omitted any mark required by the provisions of this article, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

It shall be a defense to any prosecution under this article for the defendant to prove that the said article was manufactured and marked with the intention of and for purposes of exportation from the United States and that the said article was either actually exported from the United States to a foreign country within six months after the date of manufacture thereof with the bona fide intention of being sold in the said country and of not being reimported; or that it was delivered within six months after date of manufacture thereof, to a person whose exclusive customary business is the exportation of such articles from the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Gold [22175. - 22181.]

22175.

The provisions of this article shall apply exclusively to gold and to its alloys.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

22176.

As used in this article “quality mark” means any mark indicating or purporting to indicate that any article is composed of gold or of any of its alloys or indicating or purporting to indicate the quality, fineness, quantity, weight or kind of gold or its alloys in an article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

22177.

A quality mark need not be applied to any article, but if a quality mark is applied to any article it shall be applied in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

22178.

A quality mark applied to any article shall indicate the number of twenty-fourth parts by weight of pure gold or its alloy contained in the article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

22179.

The variation between the actual fineness of the gold or its alloy contained in any article and that indicated by the quality mark applied to such article shall not exceed the tolerances for fineness prescribed for articles made of gold and its alloys which are to be moved in interstate commerce by that act of the United States Government entitled “An act forbidding the importation, exportation or carriage in interstate commerce of falsely or spuriously stamped articles of merchandise made of gold or silver or their alloys, or for other purposes,” approved June 13, 1906 (34 Stats. 260; 15 U.S.C. Secs. 294-300, inclusive).

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

22180.

Any person who applies or causes any quality mark to be applied to any article which is made in whole or in part of gold or of any of its alloys shall also apply a trade-mark duly applied for or registered to him under the laws of the United States or of this State to such article.

If the person so applying such mark is the manufacturer of the article and has sold or contracted to sell such article to a jobber, wholesale or retail dealer regularly engaged in the business of buying and selling similar articles, this section shall be deemed to be complied with if a trade-mark duly registered under the laws of the United States or of this State to such jobber, wholesale or retail dealer is applied to such article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------

22181.

Any person or any officer, director, employee or agent of any person who makes, sells or offers to sell or dispose of, or has in his possession with intent to sell or dispose of, any article to which is applied any quality mark which does not conform to all the provisions of this article or from which is omitted any mark required by the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 319.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Polyethylene Plastic Materials [22200. - 22205.]

22200.

No bag made of plastic material of an average gauge thinner than 0.001 inch which is large enough to fit over a child’s head shall be used by any business establishment as a container for products delivered to purchasers, or by any other business establishment to package articles delivered to customers or other persons doing business with the establishment, or, after January 1, 1988, shall be directly sold, delivered, or given to any business establishment located in the State of California by any manufacturer, supplier, or distributor after January 1, 1988, unless there is printed upon such bag, or upon a gummed label which is securely attached to such
 bag, in clear legible type the following: “CAUTION—KEEP AWAY FROM SMALL CHILDREN. THE THIN FILM MAY CLING TO NOSE AND MOUTH AND PREVENT BREATHING,” or a similar warning that the bag is dangerous to small children. This section shall not apply to those plastic bags which are used exclusively for industrial purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 109, Sec. 2.   Effective May 17, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

22201.

As used in this chapter, “a bag large enough to fit over a child’s head” means any bag which, when open, has an opening larger than 25 square inches or a capacity of more than 125 cubic inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1546.)
-------------------------------------------

22202.

As used in this chapter, “clear legible type” means type which meets all the following qualifications:

(a) Is clear and legible.

(b) Is of a bright color which will be clearly visible against either a light or a dark background.

(c) Is printed by some method other than rubber stamp, such as by offset or letterpress, so as to prevent the ink from smearing and to insure that the printed matter will be clear and distinct.

(d) Is not less than the following size:Total of length and widthof bag combinedSize of typeLess than 30 inches10 point30 inches or more, but less than 40 inches14 point40 inches or more, but less than 60 inches18 point60 inches or more24 point

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 197.)
-------------------------------------------

22203.

No bag made of polyethylene plastic material thinner than 0.001 inch which is large enough to fit over a child’s head shall be used, after the effective date of this section, by any retail store as a container for products, other than for food products weighing not more than five pounds, delivered to purchasers, or by any other retail business establishment to package articles delivered to customers, if any cartoon, picture, or caricature is on such bag which cartoon, picture, or caricature will, or will have a tendency to, facilitate or encourage the use of such bag as a toy by children under 12 years of age.

This section does not
 prohibit legitimate advertising which does not facilitate or encourage the use of such bag as a toy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 197.)
-------------------------------------------

22205.

Any violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 22202 by Stats. 1961, Ch. 197.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Tax Preparers [22250. - 22259.]

22250.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Tax Preparation Act. Whenever a reference is made to the Tax Preparation Act by any statute, it shall be construed to refer to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 2.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22250.1.

(a) A tax preparer shall maintain a bond issued by a surety company admitted to do business in this state for each individual preparing tax returns for another person. The principal sum of the bond shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000). A tax preparer subject to this section shall provide to the surety company proof that the individual is at least 18 years of age before a surety bond may be issued.

(b) The bond required by this section shall be in favor of, and payable to, the people of the State of California and shall be for the benefit of any person or persons damaged by any fraud, dishonesty, misstatement, misrepresentation, deceit, or any unlawful acts or omissions by the tax preparer, or the tax preparers employed or associated with it to provide tax
 preparation services.

(c) The tax preparer filing the bond shall identify all tax preparers employed or associated with the tax preparer and shall provide for each employee or associate the evidence required by subdivision (a) to the surety company. A tax preparer employed or associated with a tax preparer shall be covered by the bond of the tax preparer with which the tax preparer is employed or associated. However, in no event shall the total bond required for any single tax preparer and the tax preparers employed or associated with it be required to exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000). The aggregate liability of the surety to any and all persons regardless of the number of claims against the bond or the number of years the bond remains in force shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for any one tax preparer. Any revision of the bond amount shall not be cumulative. The liability of the surety on the bond shall
 not include payment of any civil penalties, fines, attorney’s fees, or any other cost provided by statute or regulation.

(d) The tax preparer shall file an amendment to the bond within 30 days of a change in information contained in the bond, including a change in the tax preparers employed or associated with the tax preparer.

(e) (1) A tax preparer shall not conduct business without having a current surety bond in the amount prescribed by this section.

(2) Thirty days prior to the cancellation or termination of any surety bond required by this section, the surety shall send a written notice of that cancellation or termination to the tax preparer and the California Tax Education Council, identifying the bond and the date of cancellation or termination.

(3) If a tax preparer fails to obtain a new bond by the effective date of the cancellation or termination of the former bond, the tax preparer shall cease to conduct business until that time as a new surety bond is obtained.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure, a tax preparer shall not make a deposit in lieu of bond.

(g) A tax preparer shall furnish evidence of the bond required by this section upon the request of any state or federal agency or any law enforcement agency or the California Tax Education Council.

(h) On and after July 1, 2019, a tax preparer shall report a paid claim against its surety bond to the council, and the council shall post a notice of the claim on its internet
 website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 17.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22251.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), “tax preparer” includes:

(A) A person who, for a fee or for other consideration, assists with or prepares tax returns for another person or who assumes final responsibility for completed work on a return on which preliminary work has been done by another person, or who holds himself or herself out as offering those services. A person engaged in that activity shall be deemed to be a separate person for the purposes of this chapter, irrespective of affiliation with, or employment by,
 another tax preparer.

(B) A corporation, partnership, association, or other entity that has associated with it persons not exempted under Section 22258, which persons shall have as part of their responsibilities the preparation of data and ultimate signatory authority on tax returns or that holds itself out as offering those services or having that authority.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “tax preparer” does not include an employee who, as part of the regular clerical duties of his or her employment, prepares his or her employer’s income, sales, or payroll tax returns.

(b) “Tax return” means a return, declaration, statement, refund claim, or other document required to be made or filed in connection with state or
 federal income taxes or state bank and corporation franchise taxes.

(c) An “approved curriculum provider,” for purposes of basic instruction as described in subdivision (a) of Section 22255, and continuing education as described in subdivision (b) of Section 22255, is one who has been approved by the council as defined in subdivision (d).

(d) “Council” means the California Tax Education Council that is a single nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(e) “Client” or “customer” means an individual for whom a tax preparer performs or agrees to perform tax preparation services.

(f) “Refund anticipation loan” means a loan, whether provided by the tax preparer or another entity, such as a financial institution, in anticipation of, and whose payment is secured by, a client’s federal or state income tax refund or by both.

(g) “Refund anticipation loan fee schedule” means a list or table of refund anticipation loan fees that includes three or more representative refund anticipation loan amounts. The schedule shall separately list each fee or charge imposed, as well as a total of all fees imposed, related to the making of a refund anticipation loan. The schedule shall also include, for each representative loan amount, the estimated annual percentage rate calculated under the guidelines established by the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.).

(h) “Registrant” means a tax preparer that has met all of the requirements of this chapter and has been issued a registration by the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 3.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22251.1.

It is the intent of this chapter to enable consumers to easily identify credible tax preparers who are bonded and registered, to ensure tax preparers receive adequate education and treat confidential information appropriately, to prohibit tax preparers from making fraudulent, untrue, or misleading representations, and to provide for a self-funded nonprofit oversight body to register tax preparers and ensure that they meet all of the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 660, Sec. 2.   (SB 484)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22251.2.

(a) The California Tax Education Council, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22251, shall carry out the responsibilities and duties set forth in this chapter.

(b) Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the council in exercising its registration and disciplinary authority, and any other functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(c) The council shall be governed by a board of directors comprised of the following:

(1) Not more than one representative from each California nonprofit corporation in good standing that chooses to participate in the council and that represents tax preparers, enrolled agents, attorneys, or certified public accountants with a membership in California of at least 400 in each of the previous three calendar years.

(2) Not more than one representative from each for-profit tax preparation corporation in good standing that chooses to participate in the council and that had at least 400 employees or franchisees, which number can include the employees of a franchisee, in California during the previous calendar year and that has been operating in California for the last three years.

(3) Six individuals who are tax preparers pursuant to Section 22255 and are
 appointed through a process established by the council to the board of directors with full voting privileges to serve terms as determined by the council, with their initial terms being served on a staggered basis. A person exempt from the requirements of this chapter pursuant to Section 22258 is not eligible for appointment to the council, other than an employee of an individual in an exempt category.

(d) The meetings of the board of directors shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The board of directors may adopt additional policies and procedures that provide greater transparency to registrants and the public than required by the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act.

(e) The council may take any reasonable actions to carry out the responsibilities and duties set forth in this chapter, including, but not limited to, hiring staff and entering into contracts.

(f) The council shall issue registrations, deny applications, and discipline registrants as authorized by this chapter. The council may adopt bylaws, rules, regulations, and procedures necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(g) The council shall establish application fees, renewal fees, delinquent fees, and other fees related to the regulatory cost of providing services and carrying out the council’s responsibilities and duties pursuant to this chapter. These fees shall not exceed the reasonable cost to the council of providing those services and carrying out those
 responsibilities and duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 4.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22251.3.

(a) The council shall issue a registration to any applicant who provides satisfactory evidence that he or she meets all of the requirements of this chapter and who complies with the bylaws, rules, and procedures established by the council.

(b) In order to obtain a registration, an applicant shall submit a written application in a form provided by the council and provide the council with satisfactory evidence that he or she meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The applicant has successfully completed the educational requirements described in subdivision (a) of Section 22255.

(2) The applicant has successfully passed a background investigation pursuant to Section 22253.5.

(3) All fees required by the council as described in subdivision (c) of Section 22251.2 have been paid.

(4) The applicant meets all of the other requirements for registration in this chapter.

(c) Any registration under this chapter shall be subject to renewal every year in a manner prescribed by the council, and shall expire unless renewed in that manner. The council may provide for the late renewal of a registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 5.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22251.4.

(a) The council shall establish and maintain on its Internet Web site a searchable public registry of registrants. Each registrant’s listing shall clearly indicate whether the registrant is actively in compliance with the annual registration requirements and shall include any of the following information that is applicable to the registrant:

(1) The registrant’s name and mailing address.

(2) The registrant’s California Tax Education Council registration number.

(3) Any other information the council believes would be beneficial to
 consumers of tax preparation services that is consistent with protecting the public pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 22251.2.

(b) The Internet Web site of the council shall contain direct links to the Internet Web sites maintained by the California Board of Accountancy, the State Bar of California, and the Internal Revenue Service where public information regarding tax preparers exempt from this chapter may be obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 6.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.

Prior to rendering any tax preparation services, a tax preparer shall provide the customer in writing with the following:

(a) The tax preparer’s name, address, and telephone number.

(b) Evidence of compliance with the bonding requirement of Section 22250.1, including the bond number, if any.

(c) The address of the Internet Web site of the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 7.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.1.

(a) No confidential information obtained by a tax preparer, in his or her professional capacity, concerning a client or a prospective client shall be disclosed by the tax preparer without the written permission of the client or prospective client, except for the following:

(1) Disclosures made by a tax preparer in compliance with a subpoena or a summons enforceable by order of a court.

(2) Disclosures made by a tax preparer regarding a client or prospective client to the extent the tax preparer reasonably believes it is necessary to maintain or defend himself or herself in a legal proceeding initiated by the client or prospective client.

(3) Disclosures made by a tax preparer in response to an official inquiry from a federal or state government regulatory agency.

(4) Disclosures made by a tax preparer or to a tax preparer’s duly authorized representative to another tax preparer in connection with a proposed sale or merger of the tax preparer’s professional practice.

(5) Disclosures made by a tax preparer to either of the following:

(A) Another tax preparer to the extent necessary for purposes of professional consultation.

(B) Organizations that provide professional standards review and ethics or quality control peer review.

(6) Disclosures made when specifically required by law.

(b) In the event that confidential client information may be disclosed to persons or entities outside the United States of America in connection with the services provided, the tax preparer shall inform the client in writing and obtain the client’s written permission for the disclosure.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section complement and does not replace Section 17530.5 as applied to tax preparers by subdivision (f) of Section 1799.1a of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 921, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.5.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is important to inform taxpayers that they may make voluntary contributions to certain funds or programs, as provided on the state income tax return. The Legislature further finds and declares that many taxpayers remain unaware of the voluntary contribution check-offs on the state income tax return. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage all persons who prepare state income tax returns, including tax preparers, to inform their clients in writing, prior to the completion of any state income tax return, that they may make a contribution to any voluntary contribution check-off on the state income tax return if they so choose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22253.

(a) It is a violation of this chapter for a tax preparer to do or commit, and the council may deny an application for registration or discipline a registrant for, any of the following:

(1) Fail to register as a tax preparer with the council.

(2) Make, or authorize the making of, any statement or representation, oral or written or recorded by any means, which is intended to induce persons to use the tax preparation service of the tax preparer, which statement or representation is fraudulent, untrue, or misleading.

(3) Obtain the signature of a customer to a tax return or
 authorizing document which contains blank spaces to be filled in
 after it has been signed.

(4) Fail or refuse to give a customer, for his or her own records, a copy of any document requiring the customer’s signature, within a reasonable time after the customer signs the document.

(5) Fail to maintain a copy of any tax return prepared for a customer for four years from the date of completion or the due date of the return, whichever is later.

(6) Engage in advertising practices which are fraudulent, untrue, or misleading, including, but not limited to, assertions that the bond required by Section 22250.1 in any way implies licensure or endorsement of a tax preparer by the State of
 California.

(7) Violate Section 17530.5.

(8) Violate Section 7216 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(9) Fail to sign a customer’s tax return when payment for services rendered has been made.

(10) Fail to return, upon the demand by or on behalf of a customer, records or other data provided to the tax preparer by the customer.

(11) Knowingly give false or misleading information to the consumer pursuant to Section 22252, or give false or misleading information to the surety company pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22250.1, or give false or misleading information to the
 California Tax Education Council pursuant to Section 22255.

(12) Commit unprofessional conduct, including, but not limited to, denial of licensure, certificate, permit, or registration, or revocation, suspension, restriction, or any other disciplinary action against an applicant or registrant by the federal government or another state or territory of the United States, by any other government agency, or by another professional licensing board or organization. A certified copy of the decision, order, or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of these actions.

(13) Procure or attempt to procure a registration by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake.

(14) Violate or attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or
 abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, any provision or term of this chapter or any rule or bylaw adopted by the council.

(15) Be convicted of any felony or misdemeanor that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a registrant, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the crime.

(16) Impersonate an applicant or act as a proxy for an applicant in any situation or examination referred to under this chapter for the issuance of a registration.

(17) Impersonate a registrant, or permit or allow an unregistered person to use a registration.

(18) Commit any fraudulent, dishonest, or corrupt act
 that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a registrant.

(b) Each violation of this section constitutes a separate offense.

(c) A violation of paragraphs (12) to (18), inclusive, of subdivision (a) is not subject to subdivision (b) of Section 22256.

(d) The council may enter into an agreement with the Franchise Tax Board to provide reimbursement to the Franchise Tax Board for assistance in carrying out enforcement activities consistent with this chapter.

(e) Beginning July 1, 2019, the council shall post the following on its Internet Web site:

(1) All disciplinary
 actions taken against registrants by the council, including, but not limited to, misconduct that resulted in a suspension or revocation.

(2) A list of registrants on probation, including the misconduct that resulted in the probation and any terms of probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 597, Sec. 8.   (AB 3143)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22253.1.

(a) Any tax preparer who advertises the availability of a refund anticipation loan shall not directly or indirectly represent the loan as a client’s actual refund. Any advertisement that mentions a refund anticipation loan shall state conspicuously that it is a loan and that a fee or interest will be charged by the lending institution. The advertisement shall also disclose the name of the lending institution.

(b) Every tax preparer who offers to facilitate, or who facilitates, a refund anticipation loan to a client shall display a refund anticipation loan schedule showing the current fees for refund anticipation loans facilitated at the office, for the electronic filing of the client’s tax return, for setting up a refund account, and any other related activities necessary to receive a refund anticipation loan. The fee schedule shall also include a statement indicating that the client may have the tax return filed electronically without also obtaining a refund anticipation loan.

(c) The postings required by this section shall be made in not less than 28-point type on a document measuring not less than 16 by 20 inches. The postings required in this section shall be displayed in a prominent location at each office where any tax preparer is offering to facilitate or facilitating a refund anticipation loan.

(d) (1) Prior to the client’s completion of the refund anticipation loan application, a tax preparer that offers to facilitate a refund anticipation loan shall provide to the client a clear, written disclosure containing all of the following information:

(A) The refund anticipation loan fee schedule.

(B) That a refund anticipation loan is a loan and is not the client’s actual income tax refund.

(C) That the taxpayer can file an income tax return electronically without applying for a refund anticipation loan.

(D) The average amount of time, according to the Internal Revenue Service, within which a taxpayer who does not obtain a refund anticipation loan can expect to receive a refund if the taxpayer’s return is filed or mailed as follows:

(i) Filed electronically and the refund is deposited directly into the taxpayer’s bank account or mailed to the taxpayer.

(ii) Mailed to the Internal Revenue Service and the refund is deposited directly into the taxpayer’s bank account or mailed to the taxpayer.

(E) That the Internal Revenue Service does not guarantee that it will pay the full amount of the anticipated refund and it does not guarantee a specific date that a refund will be deposited into the taxpayer’s bank account or mailed to the taxpayer.

(F) That the client is responsible for the repayment of the refund anticipation loan and the related fees in the event that the tax refund is not paid or paid in full.

(G) The estimated time within which the loan proceeds will be paid to the client if the loan is approved.

(H) The fee that will be charged, if any, if the client’s loan is not approved.

(2) Prior to the client’s consummation of the refund anticipation loan transaction, a tax preparer that facilitates a refund anticipation loan shall provide to the client, in either written or electronic form, the following information:

(A) The estimated total fees for obtaining the refund anticipation loan.

(B) The estimated annual percentage rate for the client’s refund anticipation loan, using the guidelines established under the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 and following).

(C) A comparison of the various costs, fees, and finance charges, if applicable, associated with receiving a refund by mail or by direct deposit directly from the Internal Revenue Service, a refund anticipation loan, a refund anticipation check, or any other refund settlement options facilitated by the tax preparation service.

(e) This section shall comply with the language requirements set forth in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(f) Any tax preparer who offers to facilitate, or who facilitates, a refund anticipation loan may not engage in any of the following activities:

(1) Requiring a client to enter into a loan arrangement in order to complete a tax return.

(2) Misrepresenting a material factor or condition of a refund anticipation loan.

(3) Failing to process the application for a refund anticipation loan promptly after the client applies for the loan.

(4) Engaging in any transaction, practice, or course of business that operates a fraud upon any person in connection with a refund anticipation loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22253.2.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the California Tax Education Council when it identifies an individual who has violated paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22253.

(b) Upon receiving the notice described in subdivision (a), the California Tax Education Council may notify the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney of the violation. Upon receiving this notice, the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney may do any of the following:

(1) Cite individuals preparing tax returns in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 22253.

(2) Levy a fine up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation.

(3) Issue a cease and desist order, which shall remain in effect until the individual has complied with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22253.

(c) The California Tax Education Council may enter into an agreement with the Franchise Tax Board to provide reimbursement to the Franchise Tax Board for any expenses incurred by the Franchise Tax Board to implement subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 34.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22253.3.

(a) The council may discipline a registrant by any, or a combination, of the following methods:

(1) Placing the registration on probation.

(2) Suspending the registration and the rights conferred by this chapter on a registrant for a period not to exceed one year.

(3) Revoking the registration.

(4) Suspending or staying the disciplinary order, or portions of it, with or without conditions.

(5) Taking other action as the
 council, as authorized by this chapter or its bylaws, rules, or procedures, deems proper.

(b) The council may issue an initial registration on probation, with specific terms and conditions, to any applicant.

(c) If a registration is suspended or revoked, the council shall notify the Franchise Tax Board and the Internal Revenue Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 660, Sec. 7.   (SB 484)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22259.)
-------------------------------------------

22253.4.

(a) No registrant or applicant may be disciplined or denied registration except according to procedures satisfying the requirements of this section. A denial or discipline not in accord with this section shall be void and without effect.

(b) Any application denial or registrant discipline shall be done in good faith and in a fair and reasonable manner. Any procedures that conform to the requirements of this chapter are fair and reasonable, but a court may also find other procedures to be fair and reasonable when the full circumstances of the application denial or registrant discipline are considered.

(c) A procedure is fair and reasonable if all of the following apply:

(1) It provides the giving of 15 days prior notice of the application denial or registration discipline and the reasons therefor.

(2) It provides an opportunity for the applicant or registrant to be heard, either orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the application denial or registrant discipline by a person or body authorized to decide that the proposed application denial or registrant discipline not take place.

(d) Any notice required under this section may be given by any method reasonably calculated to provide actual notice. Any notice given by mail must be given by first-class or express mail sent to
 the last address of the applicant or registrant shown on the council’s records.

(e) Any action challenging an application denial or registrant discipline, including any claim alleging defective notice, shall be commenced within one year after the effective date of the application denial or registrant discipline in the superior court in and for the county of the council’s principal place of business. If the action is successful, the court may order any relief, including reinstatement, that it finds equitable under the circumstances.

(f) The council may charge applicants and registrants a reasonable regulatory fee as a condition of any hearing requested by the applicant or registrant for the purpose of contesting denial of a registration or discipline of a registrant.